Utah statutes.
54-4-16.   Investigation and report of accidents.

The commission shall investigate the cause of all accidents occurring within this state upon the property of any public utility, or directly or indirectly arising from or connected with its maintenance or operation, resulting in loss of life or injury to persons or property and requiring in the judgment of the commission investigation by it, and shall have the power to make such order or recommendation with respect thereto as in its judgment may seem just and reasonable; provided, that neither the order nor recommendation of the commission nor any accident report filed with the commission shall be admitted as evidence in any action for damage based on or arising out of the loss of life or injury to person or property in this section referred to. Every public utility is hereby required to file with the commission, under such rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe, a report of each accident so occurring of such kinds or classes as the commission may from time to time designate. The Department of Transportation where private and public carriers are involved shall have and assume all powers heretofore held by the commission pursuant to this section; provided that the commission shall retain exclusive jurisdiction for the resolution of any dispute upon petition by any person aggrieved by any order of the department issued pursuant thereto.

